test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-eres_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - eres: # 2A
    eres+N+Sg+Nom: eres
    eres+N+Sg+Gen: iärrás
    eres+N+Sg+Acc: iärrás
    eres+N+Sg+Ill: iärrásân
    eres+N+Sg+Loc: iärrásist
    eres+N+Sg+Com: iärrásáin
    eres+N+Sg+Abe: iärrásttáá
    eres+N+Ess:    eresin               #iärásin
    eres+N+Par:    eresid               #iärásid
    eres+N+Pl+Nom: iärráseh
    eres+N+Pl+Gen: iärrásij
    eres+N+Pl+Acc: iärrásijd
    eres+N+Pl+Ill: iärrásáid
    eres+N+Pl+Loc: iärrásijn
    eres+N+Pl+Com: iärrásijguin
    eres+N+Pl+Abe: iärrásijttáá
   
